Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.330

Powers of guardian for adult.

(1) Except as limited by court order, a guardian for an adult may:

(a) Apply for and receive funds and benefits as a representative payee or an authorized representative or protective payee for the support of the adult, unless a conservator is appointed for the adult and the application or receipt is within the powers of the conservator;

(b) Unless inconsistent with a court order, establish the adult's place of dwelling;

(c) Consent to health or other care, treatment, or service for the adult;

(d) If a conservator for the adult has not been appointed, commence a proceeding, including an administrative proceeding, or take other appropriate action to compel another person to support the adult or pay funds for the adult's benefit;

(e) To the extent reasonable, delegate to the adult responsibility for a decision affecting the adult's well-being; and

(f) Receive personally identifiable health care information regarding the adult.

(2) The court by specific order may authorize a guardian for an adult to consent to the adoption of the adult.

(3) The court by specific order may authorize a guardian for an adult to:

(a) Consent or withhold consent to the marriage of the adult if the adult's right to marry has been removed under RCW 11.130.310;

(b) Petition for divorce, dissolution, or annulment of marriage of the adult or a declaration of invalidity of the adult's marriage; or

(c) Support or oppose a petition for divorce, dissolution, or annulment of marriage of the adult or a declaration of invalidity of the adult's marriage.

(4) In determining whether to authorize a power under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the court shall consider whether the underlying act would be in accordance with the adult's preferences, values, and prior directions and whether the underlying act would be in the adult's best interest.

(5) In exercising a guardian's power under subsection (1)(b) of this section to establish the adult's place of dwelling, the guardian shall:

(a) Select a residential setting the guardian believes the adult would select if the adult were able, in accordance with the decision-making standard in RCW 11.130.325 (4) and (5). If the guardian does not know and cannot reasonably determine what setting the adult subject to guardianship probably would choose if able, or the guardian reasonably believes the decision the adult would make would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult, the guardian shall choose in accordance with RCW 11.130.325(5) a residential setting that is consistent with the adult's best interest;

(b) In selecting among residential settings, give priority to a residential setting in a location that will allow the adult to interact with persons important to the adult and meet the adult's needs in the least restrictive manner reasonably feasible unless to do so would be inconsistent with the decision-making standard in RCW 11.130.325 (4) and (5);

(c) Not later than thirty days after a change in the dwelling of the adult:

(i) Give notice of the change to the court, the adult, and any other notice party; and

(ii) Include in the notice the address and nature of the new dwelling and state whether the adult received advance notice of the change and whether the adult objected to the change;

(d) Establish or move the permanent place of dwelling of the adult to a care setting that places restrictions on the adult's ability to leave or have visitors only if:

(i) The establishment or move is in the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340;

(ii) The court authorizes the establishment or move; or

(iii) The guardian gives notice of the establishment or move at least fourteen days before the establishment or move to the adult and all persons entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5)(b) or a subsequent order, and no objection is filed;

(e) Establish or move the place of dwelling of the adult outside this state only if consistent with the guardian's plan and authorized by the court by specific order; and

(f) Take action that would result in the sale of or surrender of the lease to the primary dwelling of the adult only if:

(i) The action is specifically included in the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340;

(ii) The court authorizes the action by specific order; or

(iii) Notice of the action was given at least fourteen days before the action to the adult and all persons entitled to the notice under RCW 11.130.310(5)(b) or a subsequent order and no objection has been filed.

(6) In exercising a guardian's power under subsection (1)(c) of this section to make health care decisions, the guardian shall:

(a) Involve the adult in decision making to the extent reasonably feasible, including, when practicable, by encouraging and supporting the adult in understanding the risks and benefits of health care options;

(b) Defer to a decision by an agent under a power of attorney for health care executed by the adult and cooperate to the extent feasible with the agent making the decision; and

(c) Take into account:

(i) The risks and benefits of treatment options; and

(ii) The current and previous wishes and values of the adult, if known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

(7) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b) of this section no care setting which provides nursing or other care may detain a person within such facility against their will. Any court order, other than an order issued in accordance with the involuntary treatment provisions of chapters 10.77, 71.05, and 72.23 RCW, which purports to authorize such involuntary detention or purports to authorize a guardian or limited guardian to consent to such involuntary detention on behalf of an individual subject to a guardianship shall be void and of no force or effect.

(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court order authorizing placement of an incapacitated person in a care setting if such order is not otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That notice of any residential placement of an individual subject to a guardianship shall be served, either before or after placement, by the guardian or limited guardian on such individual, any court visitor of record, any guardian ad litem of record, and any attorney of record.

[ 2020 c 312 s 205; 2019 c 437 s 314.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.